Utah statutes.
17B-2a-607.   Contracts with other corporations.

(1)  A metropolitan water district may:

(a)  contract with one or more corporations, public or private, for the purpose of:

(i)  financing acquisitions, constructions, or operations of the district; or

(ii)  carrying out any of the district's powers;

(b)  in a contract under Subsection (1)(a), obligate itself severally or jointly with the other corporation or corporations; and

(c)  secure, guarantee, or become surety for the payment of an indebtedness or the performance of a contract or other obligation incurred or entered into by a corporation whose shares of stock the district has acquired.

(2)  A contract under Subsection (1)(a) may:

(a)  provide for:

(i)  contributions to be made by each contracting party;

(ii)  the division and apportionment of:

(A)  the expenses of acquisitions and operations; and

(B)  the contractual benefits, services, and products; and

(iii)  an agency to make acquisitions and carry on operations under the contract; and

(b)  contain covenants and agreements as necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes of the contract.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

